Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Part A. Extended Personal Jurisdiction

407.5201.
Basis for jurisdiction over nonresident.

In a proceeding to establish or enforce a support order or to determine parentage of a child, a tribunal of this state may exercise personal jurisdiction over a nonresident individual or the individual’s guardian or conservator if:

The individual is personally served with summons, or notice within this state;

The individual submits to the jurisdiction of this state by consent in a record, by entering a general appearance, or by filing a responsive pleading having the effect of waiving any contest to personal jurisdiction;

The individual resided with the child in this state;

The individual resided in this state and provided prenatal expenses or support for the child;

The child resides in this state as a result of the acts or directives of the individual;

The individual engaged in sexual intercourse in this state and the child may have been conceived by that act of intercourse;

The individual asserted parentage of a child in the putative father registry maintained in this state by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services; or

There is any other basis consistent with the constitutions of this state and the United States for the exercise of personal jurisdiction.

The bases of personal jurisdiction set forth in subsection (1) of this section or in any other law of this state may not be used to acquire personal jurisdiction for a tribunal of this state to modify a child support order of another state unless the requirements of KRS

407.5611

are met, or, in the case of a foreign support order, unless the requirements of KRS

407.5615

are met.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 365, § 16; 1998. ch. 101, § 20, effective March 23, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 594, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 642, effective June 20, 2005; 2015 ch. 18, § 4, effective June 24, 2015.

407.5202.
Duration of personal jurisdiction.

Personal jurisdiction acquired by a tribunal of this state in a proceeding under KRS

407.5101

to

407.5902

or other law of this state relating to a support order continues as long as a tribunal of this state has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify its order or continuing jurisdiction to enforce its order as provided by KRS

407.5205

,

407.5206

, and

407.5211

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 365, § 17; 1998, ch. 101, § 20, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 5, effective June 24, 2015.